apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x67E;&#x6CC;&#x648;&#x633;&#x62A;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیوست</l>
          <r>پیوستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیوسته</l>
          <r>پیوستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیوند</l>
          <r>پیوستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیوند</l>
          <r>پیوستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیوند</l>
          <r>پیوستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیوند</l>
          <r>پیوستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x67E;&#x6CC;&#x645;&#x648;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیمود</l>
          <r>پیمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیموده</l>
          <r>پیمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیما</l>
          <r>پیمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیما</l>
          <r>پیمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیما</l>
          <r>پیمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیما</l>
          <r>پیمودن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x67E;&#x6CC;&#x645;&#x627;&#x6CC;&#x6CC;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیمایید</l>
          <r>پیماییدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیماییده</l>
          <r>پیماییدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیما</l>
          <r>پیماییدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیما</l>
          <r>پیماییدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیما</l>
          <r>پیماییدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پیما</l>
          <r>پیماییدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i>ی</i>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__&#x67E;&#x648;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;">
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پوشید</l>
          <r>پوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;/&#x646;__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پوشیده</l>
          <r>پوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="zwnj_or_space"/>
        <par n="aV__/&#x627;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;__vbser"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پوش</l>
          <r>پوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__imp__prefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پوش</l>
          <r>پوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__/&#x628;&#x686;&#x634;[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__&#x646;"/>
        <par n="P__njprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پوش</l>
          <r>پوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>
                        <e>
        <par n="P__jprefixes"/>
        <p>
          <l>پوش</l>
          <r>پوشیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r>
        </p>
        <i/>
        <par n="V__&#x686;&#x634;/[&#x686;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;]__vblex"/>
      </e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="&#x67E;&#x648;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x67E;&#x648;&#x634;&#x6CC;&#x62F;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x67E;&#x6CC;&#x645;&#x627;&#x6CC;&#x6CC;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x67E;&#x6CC;&#x645;&#x627;&#x6CC;&#x6CC;&#x62F;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x67E;&#x6CC;&#x645;&#x648;&#x62F;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x67E;&#x6CC;&#x645;&#x648;&#x62F;"/></e>
                            <e lm="&#x67E;&#x6CC;&#x648;&#x633;&#x62A;&#x646;"><i/><par n="/VERBS__&#x67E;&#x6CC;&#x648;&#x633;&#x62A;"/></e>
